Utah statutes.
58-9-201.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Board of Funeral Service consisting of:

(a)  four funeral service directors who own, have an ownership interest in, or have management responsibilities for a funeral service establishment;

(b)  one preneed funeral arrangement sales agent, who does not have an ownership interest in a funeral service establishment; and

(c)  two members from the general public who have no association with the funeral service profession.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3) (a)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203. 

(b)  The board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:

(i)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and

(ii)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised the division in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer of an administrative proceeding concerning the complaint.



Amended by Chapter 144, 2007 General Session

